New Jersey, session 222, A5039.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 18 of P.L.2018, c.48 (C.54:10A-4.6) is amended to read as follows: 18.  A taxable member of a combined group shall determine its entire net income from the unitary business as its share of the entire net income of the combined group in accordance with a combined unitary tax return made pursuant to this section and sections 19, 20, and 23 of P.L.2018, c.48 (C.54:10A-4.7, C.54:10A-4.8, and C.54:10A-4.11). The entire net income from the unitary business of a combined group is the sum of the entire net incomes of each taxable member and each nontaxable member of the combined group derived from the unitary business, which shall be determined as follows: a.     For a member incorporated in the United States, the income to be included in the entire net income of the combined group shall be the member's entire net income otherwise determined pursuant to the Corporation Business Tax Act (1945), P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-1 et seq.). b. (1) For a member not incorporated in the United States, the income to be included in the entire net income of the combined group shall be determined from a profit and loss statement that shall be prepared for each foreign branch or corporation in the currency in which the books of account of the branch or corporation are regularly maintained, adjusted to conform it to the accounting principles generally accepted in the United States for the presentation of those statements and further adjusted to take into account any book-tax differences required by federal or State law.  The profit and loss statement of each foreign member of the combined group and the allocation factors related thereto, whether United States or foreign, shall be translated into or from the currency in which the parent company maintains its books and records on any reasonable basis consistently applied on a year-to-year or entity-by-entity basis. Income shall be expressed in United States dollars. In lieu of these procedures and subject to the determination of the director that the income to be reported reasonably approximates income as determined under the Corporation Business Tax Act (1945), P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-1 et seq.), income may be determined on any reasonable basis consistently applied on a year-to-year or entity-by-entity basis. (2) For privilege periods ending on and after July 31, 2022: (a) Notwithstanding any law or treaty to the contrary, and regardless of the combined return filing method other than a world-wide group combined return, for a member that is incorporated or formed in a foreign nation with a comprehensive tax treaty with the United States, entire net income shall not include an item of income or loss excluded or exempted from federal taxable income under the terms of the treaty, and no other deduction, exclusion, or elimination will be permitted for an item of income or loss excluded or exempted by this paragraph. (b) For a corporation that is not incorporated in the United States, and that is a member of a water's-edge group for privilege periods ending before July 31, 2026 or an affiliated group for purposes of filing a combined return, the member shall only include in entire net income the following:  in the case of a member that files a federal tax return, the member shall only include the member's effectively connected income or loss reported for federal purposes, as modified by the provisions of the Corporation Business Tax Act (1945), P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-1 et seq.); and in the case of a member that does not file a federal tax return but that has United States source income or loss, the member shall only include that United States source income or loss, as modified by the provisions of the Corporation Business Tax Act (1945), P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-1 et seq.), to the extent that United States source income or loss would otherwise be effectively connected income or loss if the member would have been conducting a business that is effectively connected to the United States.  For the purpose of determining what income or loss to include in entire net income pursuant to this paragraph, the member shall take into account only the items of expense and allocation factor receipts attributable to that income or loss. c. (1) (a) For privilege periods ending before July 31, 2023, if a member of a combined group receives income from the unitary business from a partnership, the combined group's entire net income shall include the member's direct and indirect distributive share of the partnership's unitary business income. (b) For privilege periods ending on and after July 31, 2023, if a member of a combined group receives income from the unitary business from a partnership, the combined group's entire net income shall include the member's direct and indirect distributive share of the partnership's unitary business income, and the unitary partnership shall not be liable for the portion of the payment imposed pursuant to section 12 of P.L.2002, c.40 (C.54:10A-15.11) that is directly, or indirectly in the case of a tiered partnership, attributable to that member. (2) The distributive share of income received by a limited partner from a qualified investment partnership shall not be considered to be derived from a unitary business unless the general partner of such investment partnership and such limited partner have common ownership. To the extent that the limited partner is otherwise carrying on or doing business in New Jersey, it shall allocate its distributive share of income from a qualified investment partnership in accordance with subsection a. of section 3 of P.L.2001, c.136 (C.54:10A-15.6) or subsection a. of section 4 of P.L.2001, c.136 (C.54:10A-15.7) as applicable. If the limited partner is not otherwise carrying on or doing business in New Jersey, its distributive share of income from an investment partnership is not subject to tax under this chapter. d.    All dividends paid by one member to another member of the combined group shall be eliminated from the income of the recipient. e.     Except as otherwise provided by regulation, business income from an intercompany transaction among members of the same combined group shall be deferred in a manner similar to the deferral under 26 C.F.R. s.1.1502-13, as determined by the director. Upon the occurrence of either of the events set forth in paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection, deferred income resulting from an intercompany transaction among members of a combined group shall be restored to the income of the seller and shall be included in the net income of the combined group as if the seller had earned the income immediately before the event: (1) The object of a deferred intercompany transaction is: (a) resold by the buyer to an entity that is not a member of the combined group, (b) resold by the buyer to an entity that is a member of the combined group for use outside the unitary business in which the buyer and seller are engaged, or (c) converted by the buyer to a use outside the unitary business in which the buyer and seller are engaged; or (2) The buyer and seller cease to be members of the same combined group, regardless of whether the buyer and seller remain sufficiently interdependent, integrated, and interrelated through their activities so as to provide a synergy and mutual benefit that produces a sharing or exchange of value between them. In the case of an event set forth in paragraph (2) of this subsection, no portion of the income or loss shall be included in entire net income of the combined group, but shall be included in the entire net income of the respective member. f.     A charitable expense incurred by a member of a combined group shall, to the extent allowable as a deduction pursuant to section 170 of the federal Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. s.170, be subtracted first from the combined group's entire net income, subject to the income limitations of that section applied to the entire net income of the group. A charitable deduction disallowed under section 170 of the federal Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. s.170, but allowed as a carryover deduction in a subsequent privilege period, shall be treated as originally incurred in the subsequent year by the same member and the provisions of this section shall apply in the subsequent privilege period in determining the allowable deduction for that privilege period. g.    A prior net operating loss conversion carryover incurred by a member of a combined group shall be deducted from the entire net income or loss allocated to this State pursuant to section 19 of P.L.2018, c.48 (C.54:10A-4.7) as follows: (1) For privilege periods ending before July 31, 2023, a prior net operating loss conversion carryover deduction shall be allowed to offset only the entire net income allocated to this State of the corporation that created the prior net operating loss; the prior net operating loss conversion carryover cannot be shared with other members of the combined group.  For privilege periods ending on and after July 31, 2023, the remaining balance of prior net operating loss conversion carryover deductions of the members of the combined group shall be pooled together and shall be allowed to offset the entire net income allocated to this State of either: the combined group for which the corporation is a member; or the corporation that created the prior net operating loss conversion carryover, provided that the corporation departs the combined group before the corporation's respective prior net operating loss conversion carryover has been completely used. (2) The prior net operating loss conversion carryover deduction computed under subsection (u) of section 4 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-4) shall be applied against the entire net income allocated to this State before the net operating loss carryover computed under subsection h. of this section. (3) For privilege periods ending before July 31, 2023, the director shall provide regulations establishing rules on how each such corporation shall apply its prior net operating loss conversion carryover against its share of entire net income allocated as if filing on a separate entity basis.  For privilege periods ending on and after July 31, 2023, the director shall provide regulations establishing rules on pooling members' prior net operating loss conversion carryovers and tracing members' prior net operating loss conversion carryovers in the event a member departs the combined group before the member's prior net operating loss conversion carryovers are completely used. (4) For privilege periods ending before the members of a combined group pool their prior net operating loss conversion carryovers for usage by the combined group, a member of the combined group may sell prior net operating loss conversion carryover to other members of the combined group, if otherwise applicable and allowable under section 2 of P.L.1997, c.334 (C.54:10A-4.2) and section 1 of P.L.1997, c.334 (C.34:1B-7.42a); provided, however, such sale of prior net operating loss conversion carryover must be made at arm's length price at the same rate as though the sale was to an unrelated taxpayer. h.    A net operating loss carryover incurred by a combined group or by a member of the combined group shall be deducted from entire net income or loss allocated to this State pursuant to section 19 of P.L.2018, c.48 (C.54:10A-4.7) as follows: (1) (a) For privilege periods beginning on or after the first day of the initial privilege period for which a combined unitary tax return is required under this section and sections 19, 20, and 23 of P.L.2018, c.48 (C.54:10A-4.7, C.54:10A-4.8, and C.54:10A-4.11), but ending before July 31, 2023, if the computation of a combined group's entire net income allocated to this State results in a net operating loss, a taxable member of such group may carry over the net operating loss allocated to this State, as calculated under this section and sections 19 and 23 of P.L.2018, c.48 (C.54:10A-4.7 and C.54:10A-4.11), and shall be deductible from entire net income derived from the unitary business in a future privilege period to the extent that the carryover and deduction is otherwise consistent with subsection (v) of section 4 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-4). (b) For privilege periods ending on and after July 31, 2023, if the computation of a combined group's entire net income allocated to this State results in a net operating loss, a combined group may carry over the net operating loss allocated to this State, as calculated under this section and sections 19 and 23 of P.L.2018, c.48 (C.54:10A-4.7 and C.54:10A-4.11), and shall be deductible from entire net income derived from the unitary business in a future privilege period to the extent that the carryover and deduction is otherwise consistent with subsection (v) of section 4 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-4). (2) (a) Where a taxable member of a combined group has a net operating loss carryover derived from a loss incurred by a combined group in a privilege period beginning on or after the first day of the initial privilege period for which a combined unitary tax return is required under this section and sections 19, 20, and 23 of P.L.2018, c.48 (C.54:10A-4.7, C.54:10A-4.8, and C.54:10A-4.11), but ending before July 31, 2023, then the taxable member may share the net operating loss carryover with other taxable members of the combined group if such other taxable members were members of the combined group in the privilege period that the loss was incurred. Any amount of net operating loss carryover that is deducted by another taxable member of the combined group shall reduce the amount of net operating loss carryover that may be carried over by the taxable member that originally incurred the loss. (b) Where a combined group has a net operating loss carryover derived from a loss incurred by the combined group in a privilege period ending on or after July 31, 2023, then the combined group may use the net operating loss carryover.  Any amount of net operating loss carryover that is deducted by the combined group shall reduce the amount of net operating loss carryover that may be carried over by the combined group. (3) Where a taxable member of a combined group has a net operating loss carryover derived from a loss incurred in a privilege period during which the taxable member was not a member of such combined group, the carryover shall remain available to be deducted by that taxable member or other group members that, in the year the loss was incurred, were part of the same combined group as such taxable member. Such carryover shall not be deductible by any other members of the combined group for privilege periods ending before July 31, 2023.  For privilege periods ending on and after July 31, 2023, such carryover may (a) be pooled with the combined group net operating loss carryover for use by the combined group or (b) be used by the taxable member that generated the carryover for that member's activities that are independent of the unitary business of the combined group; provided, however, the combined group and the members of the combined group shall use tracing protocols for all net operating loss carryovers, as may be prescribed by regulations promulgated by the director. (4) A net operating loss carryover or, for privilege periods ending on and after July 31, 2023, a combined group net operating loss carryover, shall not include any net operating loss incurred during any privilege period beginning prior to the first day of the initial privilege period for which a combined unitary tax return is required under this section and sections 19 and 23 of P.L.2018, c.48 (C.54:10A-4.7 and C.54:10A-4.11). (5) Where a taxable member of a combined group has a net operating loss carryover derived from a loss incurred by a combined group in a privilege period beginning on or after the first day of the initial privilege period for which a combined unitary tax return is required under this section and sections 19, 20, and 23 of P.L.2018, c.48 (C.54:10A-4.7, C.54:10A-4.8, and C.54:10A-4.11), and the taxable member departs the combined group and continues to be a taxpayer for the purposes of the Corporation Business Tax Act (1945), P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-1 et seq.), the taxable member shall be entitled to take its respective portion of the combined group net operating loss carryover and the combined group shall not be entitled to use such portion of the net operating loss carryover. (6) For privilege periods ending on and after July 31, 2023, each taxable member of a combined group shall track that member's proportionate share of any combined group net operating loss carryovers used. i.     Tax credits earned by a member of a combined group shall be utilized as follows: (1) If a taxable member of a combined group earns a tax credit in a privilege period beginning on or after the first day of the initial privilege period for which a combined unitary tax return is required under this section and sections 19, 20, and 23 of P.L.2018, c.48 (C.54:10A-4.7, C.54:10A-4.8, and C.54:10A-4.11), then the taxable member may share the credit with other taxable members of the combined group. Any amount of credit that is utilized by another taxable member of the combined group shall reduce the amount of credit carryover that may be carried over by the taxable member that originally earned the credit. If a taxable member of a combined group has a tax credit carryover derived from a privilege period beginning on or after the first day of the initial privilege period for which a combined unitary tax return is required under this section and sections 19, 20, and 23 of P.L.2018, c.48 (C.54:10A-4.7, C.54:10A-4.8, and C.54:10A-4.11), then the taxable member may share the carryover credit with other taxable members of the combined group. (2) If a taxable member of a combined group has a tax credit carryover derived from a privilege period beginning prior to the first day of the initial privilege period for which a combined unitary tax return is required under this section and sections 19, 20, and 23 of P.L.2018, c.48 (C.54:10A-4.7, C.54:10A-4.8, and C.54:10A-4.11), then the taxable member may share the carryover credit with other taxable members of the combined group. (3) If a taxable member of a combined group has a tax credit carryover derived from a privilege period during which the taxable member was not a member of such combined group, the credit carryover shall remain available to be utilized by such taxable member or other group members. (4) To the extent a taxable member has more than one corporation business tax credit that it may utilize in a privilege period, whether such credits were earned by said member or are available to said member in accordance with paragraphs (1), (2) and (3) of this subsection, the order of priority of the application of the credits shall be as prescribed by the director. j.     An expense of a member of the combined group that is directly or indirectly attributable to the income of any member of the combined group, which income this State is prohibited from taxing pursuant to the laws or Constitution of the United States, shall be disallowed as a deduction for purposes of determining the combined group's entire net income. k.    Nothing in this section shall apply to: (1) A corporation or combined group which is licensed, in whole or in part, as an insurance company under the laws of this State or of another state, including corporations which are surplus lines insurers declared eligible by the Commissioner of Banking and Insurance pursuant to section 11 of P.L.1960, c.32 (C.17:22-6.45) to insure risks within this State that is not a combinable captive insurance company. Notwithstanding a provision, if any, to the contrary in this section, the income of an insurance company that is not a combinable captive insurance company, the allocation or apportionment of income related thereto and the apportionment factors of an insurance company that is not a combinable captive insurance company shall not be included in a combined unitary tax return filed under this section and sections 19, 20, and 23 of P.L.2018, c.48 (C.54:10A-4.7, C.54:10A-4.8, and C.54:10A-4.11). In addition, the dividend exclusion provisions of paragraph (5) of subsection (k) of section 4 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-4) relating to dividends paid by insurance companies to non-insurance companies included in the unitary group shall not be affected by P.L.2018, c.48 (C.54:10A-5.41 et al.). (2) A corporation that is regulated, in whole or in part, by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the New Jersey Board of Public Utilities, or similar regulatory body of another state, with respect to rates charged to customers for electric or gas services and water and wastewater services. l.     (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2020, c.118) m.   To the extent consistent with the Corporation Business Tax Act (1945), P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-1 et seq.), the federal rules and regulations governing consolidated return net operating losses and net operating loss carryovers shall apply to the New Jersey net operating loss carryover provisions under subsection h. of this section as though the combined group filed a federal consolidated return, regardless of how the members of the combined group filed for federal purposes. n.    The principles and provisions set forth in federal regulations promulgated pursuant to section 1502 of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. s.1502), shall apply to the extent consistent with the Corporation Business Tax Act (1945), P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-1 et seq.), New Jersey combined group membership principles, New Jersey combined unitary return principles, and regulations set forth by the director. o.    For purposes of the deduction allowed in paragraph (4) of subsection (k) of section 4 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-4), a combined group shall be treated as one taxpayer; provided, however, a combined group shall only be eligible for the deduction if at least one of the taxable members is a banking corporation and the taxable member has an international banking facility. The income of the combined group shall not be eligible for the deduction allowed in paragraph (4) of subsection (k) of section 4 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-4) if such income was already eliminated pursuant to other subsections of this section. p.    This section shall apply to world-wide group [elective] mandatory combined returns and affiliated group elective combined returns in accordance with section 23 of P.L.2018, c.48 (C.54:10A-4.11).  An election to file an affiliated group combined return shall be an election to treat all of the member's attributes and income as though they were from one unitary business. q.    The director shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this section. (cf: P.L.2023, c.96, s.2) 2.    Section 23 of P.L.2018, c.48 (C.54:10A-4.11) is amended to read as follows: 23. a. [The] For privilege periods ending on and after July 31, 2026, the managerial member of a combined group may elect to have the combined group determined on [a world-wide basis or] an affiliated group basis.  If no such election is made, the combined group shall be determined on a [water's-edge] world-wide basis [and will take into account the incomes and allocation factors of only the following members of the combined group:]. (1) [each member incorporated in the United States, or formed under the laws of the United States, any state, the District of Columbia, or any territory or possession of the United States, excluding such a member if eighty per cent or more of both its property and payroll during the privilege period are located outside the United States, the District of Columbia, and any territory or possession of the United States;] (Deleted by amendment, P.L.    , c.     ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) (2) [each member incorporated or formed under the laws of a foreign nation, if twenty per cent or more of both its property and payroll during the privilege period are located in the United States, the District of Columbia, or any territory or possession of the United States;] (Deleted by amendment, P.L.    , c.     ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) (3) [any member that earns more than 20% of its income, directly or indirectly, from intangible property or related service activities that are deductible against the income of other members of the combined group;] (Deleted by amendment, P.L.    , c.     ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) (4) (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2023, c.96) (5) [any member, wherever incorporated or formed, that is not included in paragraphs (1) through (3) of this subsection, if that member has effectively connected income or loss within the meaning of the federal Internal Revenue Code, as modified by the provisions of the Corporation Business Tax Act (1945), P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-1 et seq.). For any member that is included pursuant to this paragraph, the member shall be included in the combined group only to the extent of its effectively connected income or loss, taking into account items of expense and allocation factors associated with the effectively connected income or loss.] (Deleted by amendment, P.L.    , c.     ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) b.    [A world-wide election or an] An affiliated group election is effective only if made on a timely filed, original return for a privilege period by the managerial member of the combined group.  Such election is binding for, and applicable to, the privilege period for which it is made and for the five immediately succeeding privilege periods.  Provided however, the election can be revoked prior to the expiration of the binding period by written request to the Director of Taxation for reasonable cause including but not limited to a substantial change in ownership, members of the combined group or principal business, or changes in tax law, regulation or policy. c.     If the managerial member elects to determine the members of a combined group on an affiliated group basis, the taxable members shall take into account the entire net income or loss and allocation factors of all of the members of its affiliated group, regardless of whether such members are engaged in a unitary business, that are subject to tax or would be subject to tax under this chapter, if doing business in this State. d.    The director shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this section. (cf: P.L.2023, c.96, s.5) 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.